Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-199
Weighing and measuring devices; presumption.

Whenever weighing and measuring devices exist in or about any place in which or from which buying or selling is commonly carried on, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that such weighing and measuring devices are commercial weighing and measuring devices.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 29.